Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Torrens Title Registration

38-36-101.
Application to register title - by whom made.

Prior to January 1, 2018, the owner of any estate or interest in land, whether legal or equitable, except unpatented land, may apply as provided in this article 36 to have the title of said land registered. The application may be made by the applicant personally, or by an agent thereunto lawfully authorized in writing, which authority shall be executed and acknowledged in the same manner and form as is now required as to a deed, and shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder in the county in which the land, or the major portion thereof, is situated before the making of the application by such agent. A corporation may apply by its authorized agent, and an infant or any other person under disability by his legal guardian. Joint tenants and tenants in common shall join in the application. The person in whose behalf the application is made shall be named as applicant.

On or after January 1, 2018, no more applications to register titles under this article 36 may be made.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 311, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 714.

C.L.

§ 4924.

CSA:

C. 40, § 169.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended,(SB 17-140), ch. 212, p. 826, § 1, effective August 9.

38-36-102.
Lesser estates - when registered.

It shall not be an objection to bringing land under this article that the estate or interest of the applicant is subject to any outstanding lesser estate, mortgage, lien, or charge. No mortgage, lien, charge, or lesser estate than a fee simple shall be registered unless the estate in fee simple to the same land is registered. Every such lesser estate, mortgage, lien, or charge shall be noted upon the certificate of title and the duplicate thereof, and the title or interest certified shall be subject only to such estates, mortgages, liens, and charges as are so noted, except as provided in this article.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 312, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 715.

C.L.

§ 4925.

CSA:

C. 40, § 170.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-2.

38-36-103.
When tax title may be registered.

No title derived through sale for any tax or assessment or special assessment shall be entitled to be registered unless it appears that the title of the applicant, or those through whom he claims title, has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, and a decree of such court duly made and recorded decreeing the title of the applicant, or that the applicant or those through whom he claims title have been in the actual and undisputed possession of the land under such title at least seven years immediately prior to the application, and has paid all taxes and assessments legally levied thereon during said time; unless the same is vacant and unoccupied lands or lots, in which case, where title is derived through sale for any tax or assessments or special assessment for any such vacant and unoccupied lands or lots and the applicant, or those through whom he claims title, have paid all taxes and assessments legally levied thereon for eight successive years immediately prior to the application, in which case such lands and lots shall be entitled to be registered as other lands provided for by this section.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 312, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 716.

C.L.

§ 4926.

CSA:

C. 40, § 171.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-3.

38-36-104.
Contents of application.

The application shall be in writing and shall be signed and verified by the oath of the applicant or the person acting in his behalf. It shall set forth substantially:

The name and place of residence of the applicant, and if the application is by one acting in behalf of another, the name and place of residence and capacity of the person so acting;

Whether the applicant (except in the case of a corporation) is married or not, and if married, the name and residence of the husband or wife, and the age of the applicant;

The description of the land and the valuation for assessment thereof, exclusive of improvements, according to the last official assessment, the same to be taken as a basis for the payments required under sections 38-36-186 and 38-36-198 (1)(a);

The applicant’s estate or interest in the same, and whether the same is subject to homestead exemption;

The names of all persons or parties who appear of record to have any title, claim, estate, lien, or interest in the lands described in the application for registration;

Whether the land is occupied or unoccupied, and if occupied by any other person than the applicant, the name and post-office address of each occupant and what estate or interest he has or claims in the land;

Whether the land is subject to any lien or encumbrance, and, if any, the nature and amount of the same, and if recorded, the book and page of record, and the name and post-office address of each holder thereof;

Whether any other person has any estate or claims any interest in the land, in law or equity, in possession, remainder, reversion, or expectancy, and, if any, the name and post-office address of every such person and the nature of his estate or claim;

In case it is desired to settle or establish boundary lines, the names and post-office addresses of all the owners of the adjoining lands that may be affected thereby, so far as the applicant is able upon diligent inquiry to ascertain the same;

If the application is on behalf of a minor, the age of such minor shall be stated;

When the place of residence of any person whose residence is required to be given is unknown, it may be so stated if the applicant also states that upon diligent inquiry he has been unable to ascertain the same.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 312, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 717.

C.L.

§ 4927.

CSA:

C. 40, § 172.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-4.

38-36-105.
What lands may be joined in one application.

Any number of contiguous pieces of land in the same county and owned by the same person and in the same right, or any number of pieces of property in the same county having the same chain of title and belonging to the same person, may be included in one application.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 314, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 718.

C.L.

§ 4928.

CSA:

C. 40, § 173.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-5.

38-36-106.
Amendment of application.

The application may be amended only by supplemental statement in writing, signed and sworn to as in the case of the original application.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 314, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 719.

C.L.

§ 4929.

CSA:

C. 40, § 174.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-6.

38-36-107.
Form of application.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 314, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 720.

C.L.

§ 4930.

CSA:

C. 40, § 175.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-7.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 315, § 71, effective May 20.

38-36-108.
Application made to district court - powers of court.

The application for registration shall be made to the district court of the county wherein the land is situated. Said court has power to inquire into the condition of the title to and any interest in the land, and any lien or encumbrance thereon, and to make all orders, judgments, and decrees as may be necessary to determine, establish, and declare the title or interest, legal or equitable, as against all persons, known or unknown, and all liens and encumbrances existing thereon, whether by law, contract, judgment, mortgage, trust deed, or otherwise, and to declare the order, priority, and preference as between the same, and to remove all clouds from the title, and for that purpose the said court shall always be open.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 316, § 8.

R.S. 08:

§ 721.

C.L.

§ 4931.

CSA:

C. 40, § 176.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-8.

38-36-109.
Registrars of titles - rules.

The county clerk and recorders of the several counties of this state shall be registrars of titles in their respective counties, and their deputies shall be deputy registrars. All acts performed by registrars and deputy registrars under this article shall be performed under rules and instructions established and given by the district court having jurisdiction of the county in which they act.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 316, § 9.

R.S. 08:

§ 722.

C.L.

§ 4932.

CSA:

C. 40, § 177.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-9.

38-36-110.
Bond of registrar.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every county clerk and recorder shall, before entering upon the duties as registrar of titles, give a bond with sufficient sureties, to be approved by a judge of the district court of the county, payable to the people of the state of Colorado in such sum as is fixed by the said judge of the district court, conditioned for the faithful discharge of duties and to deliver up all papers, books, records, and other property belonging to the county or appertaining to the office as registrar of titles, whole, safe, and undefaced, when lawfully required to do so. The bond shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and a copy thereof shall be filed and entered upon the records of the district court in the county wherein the county clerk and recorder holds office.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage on behalf of the county clerk and recorder to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the county clerk and recorder while in office.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 316, § 10.

R.S. 08:

§ 723.

C.L.

§ 4933.

CSA:

C. 40, § 178.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-10.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 565, § 31, effective August 11.

38-36-111.
Duties of deputy registrar - vacancies.

Deputy registrars shall perform all duties of the registrar in the name of the registrar, and the acts of such deputies shall be held to be the acts of the registrar, and in the case of the death of the registrar or his removal from office, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as is provided by law for filling such vacancy in the office of the county clerk and recorder. The person so appointed to fill such vacancy shall file a bond and be vested with the same powers as the registrar whose office he is appointed to fill.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 317, § 11.

R.S. 08:

§ 724.

C.L.

§ 4934.

CSA:

C. 40, § 179.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-11.

38-36-112.
Registrar not to practice law - neglect of duty.

No registrar or deputy registrar shall practice as an attorney or counselor at law, nor prepare any papers in any proceeding provided for in this article, nor while in office be in partnership with any attorney or counselor at law so practicing. The registrar shall be liable for any neglect or omission of the duties of his office when occasioned by a deputy registrar in the same manner as for his own personal neglect or omission.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 317, § 12.

R.S. 08:

§ 725.

C.L.

§ 4935.

CSA:

C. 40, § 180.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-12.

38-36-113.
Examiner of titles - compensation - oath or affirmation - bond.

The judges of the district court in and for the judicial districts for which they are elected or appointed shall appoint a competent attorney in each county within their district as examiner of titles and legal adviser of the registrar. The examiner of titles in each county shall be paid in each case by the applicant such compensation as the judge of the district court determines. Every examiner of titles shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101 and shall also give a bond in such amount and with such sureties as shall be approved by the judge of the district court, payable in like manner and with like conditions as required of the registrar. A copy of the bond shall be entered upon the records of said court and the original shall be filed with the registrar.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 317, § 13.

R.S. 08:

§ 726.

C.L.

§ 4936.

CSA:

C. 40, § 181.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-13.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended,(HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 704, § 47, effective August 8.

38-36-114.
Nonresident applicant to appoint process agent.

If the applicant is not a resident of the state of Colorado, he shall file with his application a paper, duly acknowledged, appointing an agent residing in this state, giving his name in full and his post-office address, and shall therein agree that the service of any legal process in proceedings under or growing out of the application shall be of the same legal effect when made on said agent as if made on the applicant within this state. If the agent so appointed dies or removes from the state, the applicant shall at once make another appointment in like manner, and if he fails to do so, the court may dismiss the application.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 318, § 14.

R.S. 08:

§ 727.

C.L.

§ 4937.

CSA:

C. 40, § 182.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-14.

38-36-115.
Filing and service of application - land registration docket.

The application shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court to which the application is made, and in case of personal service a true copy thereof shall be served with the summons, and the clerk shall docket the case in a book to be kept for that purpose, which shall be known as the “land registration docket”. The record entry of the application shall be entitled (name of applicant), plaintiff, against (here insert names of all persons named in the application as being in possession of the premises, or as having any lien, encumbrance, right, title, or interest in the land, and the names of all persons found by the report of the examiner provided for in section 38-36-118 to be in possession or to have any lien, encumbrance, right, title, or interest in the land), also all other persons or parties unknown, claiming any right, title, estate, lien, or interests in the real estate described in the application as defendants. All orders, judgments, and decrees of the court in the case shall be appropriately entered in such docket. All final orders or decrees shall be recorded, and proper reference made thereto in such docket.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 318, § 15.

R.S. 08:

§ 728.

C.L.

§ 4938.

CSA:

C. 40, § 183.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-15.

38-36-116.
Abstract of title filed with application.

The applicant shall also file with the clerk, at the time the application is made, an abstract of title such as is now commonly used, prepared, and certified to by the county clerk and recorder of the county, or by a person, firm, or corporation regularly engaged in the abstract business, having satisfied the district court that they have a complete set of abstract books and are in existence and doing business at the time of the filing of the application under this article.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 318, § 15a.

R.S. 08:

§ 729.

C.L.

§ 4939.

CSA:

C. 40, § 184.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-16.

38-36-117.
Copy of application filed with county clerk and recorder - lis pendens.

At the time of the filing of the application in the office of the clerk of the court, a copy thereof, certified by the clerk, shall be filed, but need not be recorded, in the office of the county clerk and recorder and shall have the force and effect of a lis pendens.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 319, § 16.

R.S. 08:

§ 730.

C.L.

§ 4940.

CSA:

C. 40, § 185.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-17.

38-36-118.
Examination of application and abstract - report of examiner.

Immediately after the filing of the abstract of title, the court shall enter an order referring the application to an examiner of titles, who shall proceed to examine into the title and into the truth of the matters set forth in the application, and particularly whether the land is occupied, the nature of the occupation if occupied, and by what right, and, also as to all judgments against the applicant or those through whom he claims title, which may be a lien upon the lands described in the application. He shall search the records and investigate all the facts brought to his notice, and file in the case a report thereon, including a certificate of his opinion upon the title. The clerk of the court shall thereupon give notice to the applicant of the filing of such report. If the opinion of the examiner is adverse to the applicant, he shall be allowed by the court a reasonable time in which to elect to proceed further, or to withdraw his application. The election shall be made in writing and filed with the clerk of the court.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 319, § 17.

R.S. 08:

§ 731.

C.L.

§ 4941.

CSA:

C. 40, § 186.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-18.

38-36-119.
Issuance of summons.

If, in the opinion of the examiner, the applicant has a title as alleged, and proper registration, or if the applicant, after an adverse opinion of the examiner, elects to proceed further, the clerk of the court shall immediately upon the filing of the examiner’s opinion or the applicant’s election, as the case may be, issue a summons substantially in the form provided for in section 38-36-123. The summons shall be issued by the order of the court and attested by the clerk of the court.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 319, § 18.

R.S. 08:

§ 732.

C.L.

§ 4942.

CSA:

C. 40, § 187.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-19.

38-36-120.
Parties plaintiff and defendant - unknown claimants.

The applicant shall be known in the summons as the plaintiff. All persons named in the application or found by the report of the examiner as being in possession of the premises or as having of record any lien, encumbrance, right, title, or interest in the land, and all other persons designated as follows: “All other persons or parties unknown claiming any right, title, estate, lien, or interest in, to, or upon the real estate described in the application herein”, shall be defendants.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 320, § 19.

R.S. 08:

§ 733.

C.L.

§ 4943.

CSA:

C. 40, § 188.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-20.

38-36-121.
Contents of summons - service.

The summons shall be directed to the defendants and require them to appear and answer the application within twenty days after the service of the summons, exclusive of the day of service. The summons shall be served as is provided for the service of summons in civil actions in the district court in this state, except as otherwise provided in this article. The summons shall be served upon nonresident defendants and upon “all such unknown persons or parties”, defendant, by publishing said summons in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county where the application is filed, once in each week for three consecutive weeks, and such service by publication shall be deemed complete at the end of the twenty-first day from and including the first publication. If any named defendant assents in writing to the registration as prayed for, which assent shall be endorsed upon the application or filed therewith and be duly witnessed and acknowledged, then in all such cases no service of summons upon said defendant shall be necessary.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 320, § 20.

R.S. 08:

§ 734.

C.L.

§ 4944.

CSA:

C. 40, § 189.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-21.

38-36-122.
Clerk to mail copy of summons and other notices.

The clerk of the court shall also, on or before twenty days after the first publication, send a copy thereof by mail to such defendants who are not residents of the state whose place of address is known or stated in the application and whose appearance is not entered and who are not in person served with the summons. The certificate of the clerk that he has sent such notice in pursuance of this section shall be conclusive evidence thereof. Other or further notice of the application for registration may be given in such manner and to such persons as the court or any judge thereof may direct. The summons shall be served at the expense of the applicant, and proof of the service thereof shall be made as proof of service is now made in other civil actions.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 320, § 20a.

R.S. 08:

§ 735.

C.L.

§ 4945.

CSA:

C. 40, § 190.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-22.

38-36-123.
Form of summons.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 321, § 20b.

R.S. 08:

§ 736.

C.L.

§ 4946.

CSA:

C. 40, § 191.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-23.

38-36-124.
When guardian ad litem appointed - compensation.

The court shall appoint a disinterested person to act as guardian ad litem for minors and other persons under disability and for all other persons not in being who appear to have an interest in the land. The compensation of the said guardian shall be determined by the court and paid as a part of the expense of the proceeding.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 322, § 21.

R.S. 08:

§ 737.

C.L.

§ 4947.

CSA:

C. 40, § 192.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-24.

38-36-125.
Who may answer - contents of answer.

Any person claiming an interest, whether named in the summons or not, may appear and file an answer within the time named in the summons, or within such further time as may be allowed by the court. The answer shall state all objections to the application, and shall set forth the interests claimed by the party filing the same, and shall be signed and sworn to by him or by some person in his behalf.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 322, § 22.

R.S. 08:

§ 738.

C.L.

§ 4948.

CSA:

C. 40, § 193.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-25.

38-36-126.
Decree, when no answer filed - binds unknown claimants.

If no person appears and answers within the time named in the summons or allowed by the court, the court may at once, upon the motion of the applicant, no reason to the contrary appearing and upon satisfactory proof of the applicant’s right thereto, make its order and decree confirming the title of the applicant and ordering registration of the same. By the description in the summons, “all other persons unknown, claiming any right, title, estate, lien, or interest in, to, or upon the real estate described in the application herein”, all the world are made parties defendant and shall be concluded by the default, order, and decree. The court shall not be bound by the report of the examiners of title but may require other or further proof.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 322, § 23.

R.S. 08:

§ 739.

C.L.

§ 4949.

CSA:

C. 40, § 194.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-26.

38-36-127.
Cause set for trial - default - referee appointed.

If, in any case, an appearance is entered and answer filed, the cause shall be set down for hearing on motion of either party, but a default and order shall first be entered against all persons who do not appear and answer in the manner provided in section 38-36-126. The court may refer the cause or any part thereof to one of the examiners of title, as referee, to hear the parties and their evidence, and make report thereon to the court. His report shall have the same force and effect as that of a magistrate appointed by the district court under the laws of this state, and relating to the appointment, duties, and powers of magistrates.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 322, § 24.

R.S. 08:

§ 740.

C.L.

§ 4950.

CSA:

C. 40, § 195.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-27.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 366, § 43, effective April 9.

38-36-128.
Court may order further proof.

The court may order such other or further hearing of the cause before the court or before the examiner of titles after the filing of the report of the examiner referred to in section 38-36-127 and require such other or further proof by either of the parties to the cause as to the court seems proper.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 323, § 25.

R.S. 08:

§ 741.

C.L.

§ 4951.

CSA:

C. 40, § 196.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-28.

38-36-129.
Title not proper for registration dismissed - applicant may dismiss.

If, in any case, after hearing, the court finds that the applicant has no title proper for registration, a decree shall be entered dismissing the application, and such decree may be ordered to be without prejudice. The applicant may dismiss his application at any time before the final decree, upon such terms as may be fixed by the court, and upon motion to dismiss duly made to the court.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 323, § 26.

R.S. 08:

§ 742.

C.L.

§ 4952.

CSA:

C. 40, § 197.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-29.

38-36-130.
Decree of confirmation - effect - appeal.

If the court, after hearing, finds that the applicant has title, whether as stated in his application or otherwise, proper for registration, a decree of confirmation of title and registration shall be entered. Every decree of registration shall bind the land and quiet the title thereto, except as otherwise provided in this article, and shall be forever binding and conclusive upon all persons, whether mentioned by name in the application or included in “all other persons or parties unknown claiming any right, title, estate, lien, or interest in, to, or upon the real estate described in the application herein”, and such decree shall not be opened by reason of the absence, infancy, or other disability of any person affected thereby, nor by any proceeding at law or in equity for reversing judgments or decrees, except as especially provided in section 38-36-131. An appeal may be taken as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules within the same time and upon like notice, terms, and conditions as are provided for the taking of appeals from the district court to the appellate court in civil actions.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 323, § 27.

R.S. 08:

§ 743.

C.L.

§ 4953.

CSA:

C. 40, § 198.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-30.

38-36-131.
When decree may be opened.

Any person having an interest in or lien upon the land who has not been actually served with process or notified of the filing of the application or the pendency thereof may at any time within ninety days after the entry of such decree, and not afterwards, appear and file his sworn answer to such application in like manner as prescribed in section 38-36-125 for making answer if such person had no actual notice or information of the filing of such application or the pendency of the proceeding during the pendency thereof, or until within three months of the time of the filing of such answer, which facts shall be made to appear before answering by the affidavit of the person answering or the affidavit of someone in his behalf having knowledge of the facts; and also if no innocent purchaser for value has acquired an interest. If there is any such purchaser, the decree of registration shall not be opened but shall remain in full force and effect forever, subject only to the right of appeal provided for in section 38-36-130.

Any person aggrieved by such decree in any case may pursue his remedy by suit in the nature of an action of tort against the applicant or any other person for fraud in procuring the decree and may also bring his action for indemnity as provided for in section 38-36-187.

Upon the filing of such answer, and not less than ten days’ notice having been given to the applicant and to such other interested parties as the court may order in such manner as directed by the court, the court shall proceed to review the case, and if the court is satisfied that the order or decree ought to be opened, an order shall be entered to that effect, and the court shall proceed to review the proceedings and shall make such order in the case as is equitable in the premises. An appeal may be allowed in this case, as well as from all other decrees affecting any registered title, within a like time and in a like manner as in the case of an original decree under this article, and not otherwise.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 324, § 28.

R.S. 08:

§ 744.

C.L.

§ 4954.

CSA:

C. 40, § 199.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-31.

38-36-132.
Action to recover land - limitation.

No person shall commence any proceeding for the recovery of lands or any interest, right, lien, or demand therein or upon the same adverse to the title or interest as found or decreed in the decree of registration unless within ninety days after the entry of the order or decree. This section shall be construed as giving such right of action to such person only as shall not, because of some irregularity, insufficiency, or for some other cause, be bound and concluded by such order or decree.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 324, § 29.

R.S. 08:

§ 745.

C.L.

§ 4955.

CSA:

C. 40, § 200.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-32.

38-36-133.
Certificate of title insures freedom from encumbrance - exceptions.

Every person receiving a certificate of title in pursuance of a decree of registration and every subsequent purchaser of registered land who takes a certificate of title for value and in good faith shall hold the same free from all encumbrances, except only such estates, mortgages, liens, charges, and interests as may be noted in the last certificate of title in the registrar’s office, and except any of the following rights or encumbrances subsisting, namely:

Any existing lease for a period not exceeding three years, when there is actual occupation of the premises under the lease;

All public highways embraced in the description of the land included in the certificates shall be deemed to be excluded from the certificate, and any subsisting right-of-way or other easement for ditches or water rights upon, over, or in respect to the land;

Any tax or special assessment for which a sale of the land has not been had at the date of the certificate of title;

Such right of appeal, or right to appear and contest the application, as is allowed by this article;

Liens, claims, or rights, if any, arising or existing under the constitution or laws of the United States, and which the statutes of this state cannot or do not require to appear of record in the office of the county clerk and recorder.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 325, § 30.

R.S. 08:

§ 746.

C.L.

§ 4956.

CSA:

C. 40, § 201.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-33.

38-36-134.
Contents of decree - certified copy filed.

Every decree of registration shall bear the year, day, hour, and minute of its entry and shall be signed by one of the judges of the district court. It shall state whether the owner is married or unmarried and, if married, the name of the husband or wife. If the owner is under disability it shall state the nature of the disability, and, if a minor, shall state his age. It shall contain a description of the land as finally determined by the court and shall set forth the estate of the owner, and also, in such manner as to show their relative priority, all particular estates, mortgages, easements, liens, attachments, homesteads, and other encumbrances, including rights of husband and wife, if any, to which the land or the owner’s estate is subject and shall contain any other matter or information properly to be determined by the court in pursuance of this article. The decree shall be stated in a convenient form for transcription upon the certificate of title, to be made as provided in section 38-36-139 by the registrar of titles. Immediately upon the filing of the decree of registration, the clerk shall file a certified copy thereof in the office of the registrar of titles.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 325, § 31.

R.S. 08:

§ 747.

C.L.

§ 4957.

CSA:

C. 40, § 202.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-34.

38-36-135.
Party acquiring interest after application filed made defendant.

Any person who takes by conveyance, attachment, judgment, lien, or otherwise any right, title, or interest in the land subsequent to the filing of a copy of the application for registration in the office of the county clerk and recorder shall at once appear and answer as a party defendant in the proceeding for registration, and the right, title, or interest of such person shall be subject to the order or decree of the court.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 326, § 32.

R.S. 08:

§ 748.

C.L.

§ 4958.

CSA:

C. 40, § 203.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-35.

38-36-136.
Registered land to remain under this article unless removed from registration.

Unless removed from registration in the manner stated in this section, section 38-36-204, or section 38-36-205, the obtaining of a decree of registration and receiving of a certificate of title shall be deemed an agreement running with the land and binding upon the applicant and the successors in title that the land is and remains registered land and subject to this article 36 and of all amendments thereto. All dealings with the land or any estate or interest therein after the same has been brought under this article 36, and all liens, encumbrances, and charges upon the same shall be made only subject to the terms of this article 36. The owner, or his agent or attorney, of any real property registered under the terms of this article 36 may, at any time, withdraw said real property registration from the operation of this article 36 by surrendering to the registrar his duplicate certificate of ownership, duly endorsed with a signed and acknowledged request for such withdrawal.

This request may be substantially in the following form, to wit:

[Form Excluded]

Thereupon such registrar shall certify on said certificate that said real property has been withdrawn from the operation of this article and shall cause said certificate with all notations, certifications, memorials, and endorsements thereon to be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which said real estate is situated. The fee to be paid to the county clerk and recorder for recording said certificate shall be the sum of five dollars. Such withdrawal shall not alter or affect any title, lien, encumbrance, or right pertaining to or fixed upon such real property at the time of such withdrawal.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 326, § 33.

R.S. 08:

§ 749.

C.L.

§ 4959.

L. 43:

P. 220, § 1.

CSA:

C. 40, § 204.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-36.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-36.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 710, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended,(SB 17-140), ch. 212, p. 826, § 2, effective August 9.

38-36-137.
No title by prescription or adverse possession.

No title to registered land in derogation of that of the registered owner shall ever be acquired by prescription or adverse possession.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 326, § 34.

R.S. 08:

§ 750.

C.L.

§ 4960.

CSA:

C. 40, § 205.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-37.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-37.

38-36-138.
Title to be registered - register of titles.

Immediately upon the filing of the decree of registration in the office of the registrar of titles, the registrar shall proceed to register the title or interest pursuant to the terms of the decree in the manner provided in this section. The registrar shall keep a book known as the “register of titles”, wherein he shall enter all first and subsequent original certificates of title by binding or recording them therein in the order of their numbers, consecutively, beginning with number one, with appropriate blanks for entry of memorials and notations allowed by this article. Each certificate, with such blanks, shall constitute a separate page of such book. All memorials and notations that may be entered upon the register shall be entered upon the page whereon the last certificate of title of the land to which they relate is entered. The term “certificate” or “title” used in this article includes all memorials and notations thereon.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 327, § 35.

R.S. 08:

§ 751.

C.L.

§ 4961.

CSA:

C. 40, § 206.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-38.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-38.

38-36-139.
Contents and form of certificate of registration.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 327, § 36.

R.S. 08:

§ 752.

C.L.

§ 4962.

CSA:

C. 40, § 207.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-39.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-39.

38-36-140.
Owner’s duplicate certificate of ownership - signature of owner.

The registrar shall, at the time that he enters his original certificate of title, make an exact duplicate thereof, but putting on it the words, “Owner’s duplicate certificate of ownership”, and deliver the same to the owner or to his attorney duly authorized. For the purpose of preserving evidence of the signature and handwriting of the owner in his office, it is the duty of the registrar to take from the owner, in every case where it is practicable to do so, his receipt for the certificate of title, which shall be signed by the owner in person. Such receipt, when signed and delivered in the registrar’s office, shall be witnessed by the registrar or deputy registrar. If such receipt is signed elsewhere, it shall be witnessed and acknowledged in the same manner as is now provided for the acknowledgment of deeds. When so signed, such receipt shall be prima facie evidence of the genuineness of such signature.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 328, § 37.

R.S. 08:

§ 753.

C.L.

§ 4963.

CSA:

C. 40, § 208.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-40.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-40.

38-36-141.
Two or more owners.

Where two or more persons are registered owners as tenants in common or otherwise, the owner’s duplicate certificate can be issued for the entirety, or a separate duplicate owner’s certificate may be issued to each owner for his undivided share.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 328, § 38.

R.S. 08:

§ 754.

C.L.

§ 4964.

CSA:

C. 40, § 209.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-41.

38-36-142.
Subsequent certificates.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 328, § 39.

R.S. 08:

§ 755.

C.L.

§ 4965.

CSA:

C. 40, § 210.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-42.

38-36-143.
Exchange of certificates - platting land.

A registered owner holding one duplicate certificate for several distinct parcels of land may surrender it and take out several certificates for portions thereof. A registered owner holding several duplicate certificates for several distinct parcels of land may surrender them and take out a single duplicate certificate for all of said parcels, or several certificates for different portions thereof. Such exchange of certificates, however, shall only be made by the order of the court upon petition therefor duly made by the owner. An owner of registered land who subdivides such land into lots, blocks, or acre tracts shall file with the registrar of titles a plat of said land so subdivided, in the same manner and subject to the same rules of law and restrictions as is provided for platting land that is not registered.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 329, § 40.

R.S. 08:

§ 756.

C.L.

§ 4966.

CSA:

C. 40, § 211.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-43.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-43.

38-36-144.
When certificate takes effect.

The certificate of title shall relate back to and take effect as of the date of the decree of registration.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 329, § 41.

R.S. 08:

§ 757.

C.L.

§ 4967.

CSA:

C. 40, § 212.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-44.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-44.